Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,125
Flashing signals; exception.

Whenever an illuminated flashing red or yellow light is used in a traffic signal or with a traffic sign, it shall require obedience by vehicular traffic as follows:

(1) When a red lens is illuminated with rapid intermittent flashes, drivers of vehicles shall stop at a clearly marked stop line or shall stop, if there is no such line, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if there is no crosswalk, at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering the intersection. The right to proceed shall be subject to the rules applicable after making a stop at a stop sign; and

(2) When a yellow lens is illuminated with rapid intermittent flashes, drivers of vehicles may proceed through the intersection or past such light only with caution.

This section shall not apply at railroad grade crossings. Conduct of drivers of vehicles approaching railroad grade crossings shall be governed by the rules set forth in the Nebraska Rules of the Road pertaining to such railroad grade crossings.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-616;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 221.

Generally, the failure to see an approaching vehicle is not negligence as a matter of law unless the vehicle is undisputably in a favored position. Treffer v. Seevers, 195 Neb. 114, 237 N.W.2d 114 (1975).